DTC P0016 [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]


id0102f1801800

DTC P0016

CKP-CMP correlation

DETECTION CONDITION
•  The PCM monitors the input pulses from the CKP sensor and CMP sensor. If the input pulse pick-up timing do not match each other, the PCM determines that the camshaft position does not coincide with the crankshaft position.
Diagnostic support note
•  The MIL illuminates if the PCM detects the above malfunction condition in two consecutive drive cycles or in one drive cycle while the DTC for the same malfunction has been stored in the PCM.
•  PENDING CODE is available if the PCM detects the above malfunction condition during the first drive cycle.
•  FREEZE FRAME DATA is available.
•  DTCs are stored in the PCM memory.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  Poor connection of connector
•  CMP sensor malfunction
•  CKP sensor malfunction
•  Damaged or scratched CMP sensor pulse wheel
•  Damaged or scratched CKP sensor pulse wheel
•  Foreign material on CMP sensor
•  Foreign material on CKP sensor
•  Improper valve timing

Diagnostic procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

ACTION

1
VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
•  Has the FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
2
VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
•  Verify related Service Bulletins and/or on-line repair information availability.
•  Is any related repair information available?
Yes
Perform the repair or diagnosis according to the available repair information.
•  If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
3
INSPECT CMP SENSOR CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
•  Turn the engine switch off.
•  Disconnect the CMP sensor connector.
•  Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged/pulled-out pins, corrosion).
•  Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace the terminal, then go to Step 13.
No
Go to the next step.
4
INSPECT CMP SENSOR FOR FOREIGN MATERIAL
•  Remove the CMP sensor.
•  Inspect the CMP sensor for foreign material.
•  Is there any foreign material on the CMP sensor?
Yes
Remove foreign material from the CMP sensor, then go to Step 13.
No
Go to the next step.
5
INSPECT CMP SENSOR PULSE WHEEL
•  Visually inspect the CMP sensor pulse wheel.
•  Is there any damage or scratching to the CMP sensor pulse wheel?
Yes
Replace the camshaft, then go to Step 13.
No
Go to the next step.
6
INSPECT CMP SENSOR
•  Is the CMP sensor normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the CMP, then go to Step 13.
7
INSPECT CKP SENSOR CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
•  Turn the engine switch off.
•  Disconnect the CKP sensor connector.
•  Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged/pulled-out pins, corrosion).
•  Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace the terminal, then go to Step 13.
No
Go to the next step.
8
INSPECT CKP SENSOR FOR FOREIGN MATERIAL
•  Remove the CKP sensor.
•  Inspect the CKP sensor for foreign material.
•  Is there any foreign material on the CKP sensor?
Yes
Remove foreign material from the CKP sensor, then go to Step 13.
No
Go to the next step.
9
INSPECT CKP SENSOR PULSE WHEEL
•  Visually inspect the CKP sensor pulse wheel.
•  Is there any damage or scratching to the CKP sensor pulse wheel?
Yes
Replace the CKP sensor pulse wheel, then go to Step 13.
No
Go to the next step.
10
INSPECT CKP SENSOR
•  Is the CKP sensor normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the CKP sensor, then go to Step 13.
11
INSPECT PCM CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
•  Turn the engine switch off.
•  Disconnect the PCM sensor connector.
•  Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged/pulled-out pins, corrosion).
•  Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace the terminal, then go to Step 13.
No
Go to the next step.
12
INSPECT VALVE TIMING
•  Inspect valve timing.
•  Is valve timing normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Adjust the valve timing properly, then go to the next step. (See TIMING BELT REMOVAL/INSTALLATION [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)].)
13
VERIFY TROUBLESHOOTING OF DTC P0016 COMPLETED
•  Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
•  Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
•  Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
•  Start the engine.
•  Is the same DTC present?
Yes
Replace the PCM, then go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
14
VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
•  Perform “AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE”.
•  Are any DTCs present?
Yes
Go to the applicable DTC inspection.
No
DTC troubleshooting completed.